Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
G

OLD

Cross references.

- Persons engaged in business of dealing in gold, silver, or platinum, T. 43, C. 37.

12-4-120. Duties of purchasers of gold bullion, dust, nuggets, or amalgam.

Every person purchasing within this state native gold, gold bullion, gold dust, gold nuggets, or gold amalgam shall keep in a book a register of the date of purchase, amount purchased, name of seller, and lands from which the gold was obtained. On or by the first day of January, April, July, and October of each year, every such purchaser shall file with the judge of the probate court of the county of his residence a copy of the register kept for the previous quarter.

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 66, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1981; Code 1933, § 43-405.)

12-4-121. Annual reports by judges of probate court.

No later than January 15 of each year, each judge of the probate court with whom a register has been filed pursuant to Code Section 12-4-120 shall, by certified copy, make a report to the state geologist of the registers received by that judge during the preceding year. The state geologist shall keep a record of the report open for public inspection.

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 66, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1982; Code 1933, § 43-406.)

12-4-122. Penalty.

Any person who purchases native gold, gold bullion, gold dust, gold nuggets, or gold amalgam and who fails to comply with Code Section 12-4-120 relating to such purchases shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 66, § 2; Penal Code 1910, § 699; Code 1933, § 43-9903.)